Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2505
Act; applicability.

(1) The Poison Control Act does not apply to the dispensing of poisons or preparation of medicines by practitioners credentialed under the Uniform Credentialing Act who are duly authorized by law to administer or professionally use those poisons specifically named in section 71-2501.

(2) The Poison Control Act does not apply to the sale of patent or proprietary medicines in the original package of the manufacturer, packager, or distributor when labeled in conformity with section 71-2502.

Laws 1941, c. 141, § 14, p. 564;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-933;

R.S.1943, § 81-629;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1203;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 82.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.